test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_avra_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


Tests: 

  Noun - avra: # ok
    avra+v1+N+Sg+Nom: avra
    avra+v1+N+Sg+Gen: avra
    avra+v1+N+Sg+Acc: avra
    avra+v1+N+Sg+Ill: aavran
    avra+v1+N+Sg+Loc: avraast
    avra+v1+N+Sg+Com: avrain
    avra+v1+N+Sg+Abe: avrattáá
    avra+v1+N+Ess: avran
    avra+v1+N+Par: avrad
    avra+v1+N+Pl+Nom: avrah
    avra+v1+N+Pl+Gen: avrai
    avra+v1+N+Pl+Acc: avraid
    avra+v1+N+Pl+Ill: avraid
    avra+v1+N+Pl+Loc: avrain
    avra+v1+N+Pl+Com: avraiguin
    avra+v1+N+Pl+Abe: avraittáá

  Noun - kavra: # - ok
    kavra+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  kavra
    kavra+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  kavra
    kavra+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  kavra
    kavra+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  kaavran
    kavra+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  kavraast
    kavra+v1+N+Sg+Com:  kavrain
    kavra+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  kavrattáá
    kavra+v1+N+Ess:  kavran
    kavra+v1+N+Par:  kavrad
    kavra+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  kavrah
    kavra+v1+N+Pl+Gen:  kavrai
    kavra+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  kavraid
    kavra+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  kavraid
    kavra+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  kavrain
    kavra+v1+N+Pl+Com:  kavraiguin
    kavra+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  kavraittáá

  Noun - ohra: # - ok
    ohra+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  ohra
    ohra+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  ohra
    ohra+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  ohra
    ohra+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  oohran
    ohra+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  ohraast
    ohra+v1+N+Sg+Com:  ohrain
    ohra+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  ohrattáá
    ohra+v1+N+Ess:  ohran
    ohra+v1+N+Par:  ohrad
    ohra+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  ohrah
    ohra+v1+N+Pl+Gen:  ohrai
    ohra+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  ohraid
    ohra+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  ohraid
    ohra+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  ohrain
    ohra+v1+N+Pl+Com:  ohraiguin
    ohra+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  ohraittáá
